Maine, session 132, LD1272.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2463-B is enacted to read:
§2463-B. Fire protection in accessory dwelling units
An accessory dwelling unit, as defined in Title 30-A, section 4301, subsection 1-C,
located within an existing dwelling unit or attached to or sharing a wall with an existing
dwelling unit is not required to have a fire sprinkler system as long as the wall between the
accessory dwelling unit and the existing dwelling unit meets the fire resistance rating for
town houses without fire sprinkler systems established in Department of Public Safety
rules. Accessory dwelling units that are not located within an existing dwelling unit or
attached to or sharing a wall with an existing dwelling unit are not required to have a fire
sprinkler system. For purposes of this section, "dwelling unit" includes, but is not limited
to, a structure with up to 3 separate dwelling units, including accessory dwelling units, and
"fire sprinkler system" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section 1371, subsection 5.
This section does not require an existing dwelling unit to have fire sprinkler systems if
the total number of dwelling units on the lot is 5 or less.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §4364-A, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 192, §6, is
further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
A municipality shall allow on a lot with one existing dwelling unit the addition of up to 2
3 dwelling units: one additional dwelling unit within or attached to an existing structure or
one additional detached dwelling unit, or one of each.
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §4364-A, sub-§1-C is enacted to read:
1-C. Sale or transfer allowed. A municipality may not restrict or otherwise limit an
owner's ability to sell or transfer separately a dwelling unit located on that owner's lot.
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §4364-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 192, §8, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
2. Zoning requirements. With respect to dwelling units allowed under this section,
a municipal zoning ordinance must allow additional accessory dwelling units on a lot that
contains fewer than 4 dwelling units that are single-family, duplex or triplex dwelling units
or accessory dwelling units, or some combination of those, up to a total of 4 dwelling units
per lot.
A. If more than 4 dwelling units have been constructed on a lot as a result of the
allowance under this section or section 4364‑B, the lot is not eligible for any additional
increases in density except as allowed by the municipality.
B. A municipal zoning ordinance may establish a prohibition or an allowance for lots
where a dwelling unit in existence after the implementation date of this Act is torn
down and an empty lot results.
Sec. 5. 30-A MRSA §4364-B, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 192, §12, is
further amended to read:
1. Use permitted. Except as provided in Title 12, chapter 423‑A, a municipality shall
allow an accessory dwelling unit to be located on the same lot as a single-family dwelling
Page 1 - 132LR0363(01)

411 unit in any area in which residential uses are permitted, including as a conditional use, in
422 accordance with this section.
Sec. 6. 30-A MRSA §4364-B, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 192, §15,
is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
A. If a lot contains fewer than 4 units that are single-family, duplex or triplex dwelling
units or accessory dwelling units, or some combination of those, additional accessory
dwelling units must be allowed but only up to a total of 4 dwelling units per lot; and
Sec. 7. 30-A MRSA §4364-B, sub-§3, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 192, §15,
is repealed.
Sec. 8. 30-A MRSA §4364-B, sub-§3, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 192, §15, is
amended to read:
C. An accessory dwelling unit is must be allowed on a lot that does not conform to the
municipal zoning ordinance if the accessory dwelling unit does not further increase the
nonconformity.
Sec. 9. 30-A MRSA §4364-B, sub-§4, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 672, §6, is
amended to read:
A. A municipality shall exempt an the first accessory dwelling unit on a lot from any
density requirements or calculations related to the area in which the accessory dwelling
unit is constructed. Subsequent accessory dwelling units on that same lot are subject
to density requirements or calculations related to the area in which the accessory
dwelling unit is constructed.
Sec. 10. 30-A MRSA §4364-B, sub-§4, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. An accessory dwelling unit located within an existing dwelling unit or attached to
or sharing a wall with an existing dwelling unit is not required to have a fire sprinkler
system as long as walls of the accessory dwelling unit separating the units meet the fire
resistance rating for town houses without fire sprinkler systems established in
Department of Public Safety rules. Accessory dwelling units that are not located within
an existing dwelling unit or attached to or sharing a wall with an existing dwelling unit
are not required to have a fire sprinkler system. For purposes of this subsection, "fire
sprinkler system" has the same meaning as in Title 32, section 1371, subsection 5.
Sec. 11. 30-A MRSA §4364-B, sub-§4, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. A municipality shall allow the construction or occupancy of an accessory dwelling
unit on a lot even if the owner of the lot where the accessory dwelling unit is located
does not reside in a dwelling unit on that lot.
Sec. 12. 30-A MRSA §4364-B, sub-§4, ¶G is enacted to read:
G. A municipality may not restrict or otherwise limit an owner's ability to separately
sell or transfer an accessory dwelling unit located on the owner's lot.
Sec. 13. 30-A MRSA §4401, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2023, c. 79, §1, is further
amended to read:
4. Subdivision. "Subdivision" means the division of a tract or parcel of land into 3 5
or more lots within any 5-year period that begins on or after September 23, 1971 December
Page 2 - 132LR0363(01)

412 31, 2025. This definition applies whether the division is accomplished by sale, lease,
423 development, buildings or otherwise. The term "subdivision" also includes the division of
434 a new structure or structures on a tract or parcel of land into 3 5 or more dwelling units
445 within a 5-year period, the construction or placement of 3 5 or more dwelling units on a
456 single tract or parcel of land and the division of an existing structure or structures
467 previously used for commercial or industrial use into 3 5 or more dwelling units within a
478 5-year period.
A. In determining whether a tract or parcel of land is divided into 3 5 or more lots, the
first dividing of the tract or parcel is considered to create the first 2 lots and the next
dividing of either of these first 2 lots, by whomever accomplished, is considered to
create a 3rd lot that creates the 5th lot, by whomever accomplished, is considered to
create a subdivision, unless:
(1) Both All dividings are accomplished by a subdivider who has retained one of
the lots for the subdivider's own use as a single-family residence that has been the
subdivider's principal residence for a period of at least 5 years immediately
preceding the 2nd division; or
(2) The division of the tract or parcel is otherwise exempt under this subchapter.
B. The dividing of a tract or parcel of land and the lot or lots so made, which dividing
or lots when made are not subject to this subchapter, do not become subject to this
subchapter by the subsequent dividing of that tract or parcel of land or any portion of
that tract or parcel. The municipal reviewing authority shall consider the existence of
the previously created lot or lots in reviewing a proposed subdivision created by a
subsequent dividing.
C. A lot of 40 or more acres must be counted as a lot, except:
(2) When a municipality has, by ordinance, or the municipal reviewing authority
has, by regulation, elected not to count lots of 40 or more acres as lots for the
purposes of this subchapter when the parcel of land being divided is located
entirely outside any shoreland area as defined in Title 38, section 435 or a
municipality's shoreland zoning ordinance.
D-1. A division accomplished by devise does not create a lot or lots for the purposes
of this definition, unless the intent of the transferor is to avoid the objectives of this
subchapter.
D-2. A division accomplished by condemnation does not create a lot or lots for the
purposes of this definition, unless the intent of the transferor is to avoid the objectives
of this subchapter.
D-3. A division accomplished by order of court does not create a lot or lots for the
purposes of this definition, unless the intent of the transferor is to avoid the objectives
of this subchapter.
D-4. A division accomplished by gift to a person related to the donor of an interest in
property held by the donor for a continuous period of 5 years prior to the division by
gift does not create a lot or lots for the purposes of this definition, unless the intent of
the transferor is to avoid the objectives of this subchapter. If the real estate exempt
under this paragraph is transferred within 5 years to another person not related to the
donor of the exempt real estate as provided in this paragraph, then the previously
Page 3 - 132LR0363(01)

415 exempt division creates a lot or lots for the purposes of this subsection. "Person related
426 to the donor" means a spouse, parent, grandparent, brother, sister, child or grandchild
437 related by blood, marriage or adoption. A gift under this paragraph can not be given
448 for consideration that is more than 1/2 the assessed value of the real estate.
D-5. A division accomplished by a gift to a municipality if that municipality accepts
the gift does not create a lot or lots for the purposes of this definition, unless the intent
of the transferor is to avoid the objectives of this subchapter.
D-6. A division accomplished by the transfer of any interest in land to the owners of
land abutting that land does not create a lot or lots for the purposes of this definition,
unless the intent of the transferor is to avoid the objectives of this subchapter. If the
real estate exempt under this paragraph is transferred within 5 years to another person
without all of the merged land, then the previously exempt division creates a lot or lots
for the purposes of this subsection.
E. The division of a tract or parcel of land into 3 5 or more lots and upon each of which
lots permanent dwelling structures legally existed before September 23, 1971
December 31, 2025 is not a subdivision.
F. In determining the number of dwelling units in a structure, the provisions of this
subsection regarding the determination of the number of lots apply, including
exemptions from the definition of a subdivision of land.
H-2. This subchapter may not be construed to prevent a municipality from enacting an
ordinance under its home rule authority that otherwise regulates land use activities.
A municipality may not enact an ordinance that expands the definition of "subdivision"
except as provided in this subchapter. A municipality that has a definition of
"subdivision" that conflicts with the requirements of this subsection at the time this
paragraph takes effect shall comply with this subsection no later than January 1, 2021
June 30, 2026. Such a municipality must file its conflicting definition at the county
registry of deeds by June 30, 2020 December 31, 2025 for the definition to remain valid
for the grace period ending January 1, 2021 June 30, 2026. A filing required under this
paragraph must be collected and indexed in a separate book in the registry of deeds for
the county in which the municipality is located.
I. The grant of a bona fide security interest in an entire lot that has been exempted from
the definition of subdivision under paragraphs D‑1 to D‑6, or subsequent transfer of
that entire lot by the original holder of the security interest or that person's successor
in interest, does not create a lot for the purposes of this definition, unless the intent of
the transferor is to avoid the objectives of this subchapter.
J. Unless the intent of a transferor is to avoid the objectives of this subchapter, the
division of a tract or parcel of land accomplished by the transfer of any interest in the
land to a holder does not create a lot or lots for purposes of this definition if:
(1) The transferred interest, as expressed by conservation easement, binding
agreement, declaration of trust or otherwise, is to be permanently held for one or
more of the following conservation purposes:
(a) Retaining or protecting the natural, scenic or open space values of the land;
Page 4 - 132LR0363(01)

(b) Ensuring the availability of the land for agricultural, forest, recreational or
open space use;
(c) Protecting natural resources; or
(d) Maintaining or enhancing air quality or water quality; and
(2) The transferred interest is not subsequently further divided or transferred
except to another holder.
As used in this paragraph, "holder" has the same meaning as in Title 33, section 476,
subsection 2.
Sec. 14. 30-A MRSA §4402, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2019, c. 174, §2, is further
amended to read:
6. Division of new or existing structures. Beginning July 1, 2018 January 1, 2026,
a division of a new or existing structure into 3 5 or more dwelling units whether the division
is accomplished by sale, lease, development or otherwise in a municipality where the
project is subject to municipal site plan review.
A. For the purposes of this subsection, "municipal site plan review" means review
under a municipal ordinance that sets forth a process for determining whether a
development meets certain specified criteria, which must include criteria regarding
stormwater management, sewage disposal, water supply and vehicular access and
which may include criteria regarding other environmental effects, layout, scale,
appearance and safety.
B. The municipal reviewing authority in each municipality shall determine whether a
municipal site plan review ordinance adopted by the municipality meets the
requirements of paragraph A.
Sec. 15. 33 MRSA §1601-103, sub-§(7), as amended by PL 1983, c. 190, is further
amended to read:
(7) "Condominium" means real estate, portions of which are designated for separate
ownership and the remainder of which is designated for common ownership solely by the
owners of those portions under a declaration, or an amendment to a declaration, duly
recorded pursuant to this Act. Real estate is not a condominium unless the undivided
interests in the common elements are vested in the unit owners. Any real estate
development consisting exclusively of clustered, detached, single family single-family
residences is not a condominium, unless so designated in the declaration. More than one
dwelling unit, including, but not limited to, an accessory dwelling unit, located on a single
lot, but not all owned by the same person, is not a condominium, unless so designated in
the declaration;
Sec. 16. Effective dates. That section of this Act that amends the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 30-A, section 4401, subsection 4 takes effect December 31, 2025. That
section of this Act that amends Title 30-A, section 4402, subsection 6 takes effect January
1, 2026.
Page 5 - 132LR0363(01)